Maryland, session 2026, HB1436.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
Article – Housing and Community Development
TITLE 5.5. ASSISTED HOUSING PROGRAM GRIEVANCES.
5.5–101.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *hb1436*

HOUSE BILL 1436
(A) IN THIS TITLE THE FOLLOWING WORDS HAVE THE MEANINGS
INDICATED.
(B) (1) “ASSISTED HOUSING PROGRAM” MEANS ANY FEDERALLY FUNDED
OR STATE–FUNDED PROGRAM THAT PROVIDES HOUSING ASSISTANCE.
(2) “ASSISTED HOUSING PROGRAM” INCLUDES:
(I) PUBLIC HOUSING;
(II) THE FEDERAL HOUSING CHOICE VOUCHER PROGRAM; AND
(III) AN EMERGENCY SHELTER PROGRAM.
(C) “CLIENT” MEANS AN INDIVIDUAL RECEIVING ASSISTANCE THROUGH AN
ASSISTED HOUSING PROGRAM.
(D) “OFFICE” MEANS THE OFFICE OF THE ATTORNEY GENERAL.
(E) (1) “PROVIDER” MEANS A PERSON WHO PROVIDES HOUSING TO A
CLIENT UNDER AN ASSISTED HOUSING PROGRAM.
(2) “PROVIDER” INCLUDES:
(I) A LANDLORD;
(II) A HOUSING AUTHORITY; AND
(III) A CONTINUUM OF CARE AS DEFINED IN § 4–2101 OF THIS
ARTICLE.
5.5–102.
(A) THE OFFICE SHALL:
(1) INVESTIGATE GRIEVANCES FILED UNDER THIS TITLE; AND
(2) MEDIATE RESOLUTIONS BETWEEN AGGRIEVED CLIENTS AND
PROVIDERS.
(B) TO CARRY OUT THIS TITLE, THE OFFICE MAY:

HOUSE BILL 1436 3
(1) USE THE DIVISION OF CONSUMER PROTECTION ESTABLISHED
UNDER TITLE 13 OF THE COMMERCIAL LAW ARTICLE;
(2) USE ANOTHER EXISTING UNIT OF THE OFFICE; OR
(3) CREATE A NEW UNIT WITHIN THE OFFICE.
5.5–103.
(A) (1) A CLIENT IN AN ASSISTED HOUSING PROGRAM MAY FILE A
GRIEVANCE WITH THE OFFICE FOR MATTERS REGARDING:
(I) A PROVIDER’S ACTIONS OR INACTIONS CONCERNING THE
CLIENT’S HOUSING CONDITIONS;
(II) LEASE VIOLATIONS; OR
(III) ADHERENCE TO THE RULES OF AN ASSISTED HOUSING
PROGRAM.
(2) THE OFFICE SHALL CREATE AND MAKE READILY AVAILABLE
ONLINE AND IN PHYSICAL OFFICE LOCATIONS A STANDARD FORM THAT MAY BE
USED FOR FILING A GRIEVANCE.
(3) THE OFFICE SHALL ESTABLISH A TOLL–FREE HOTLINE TO
PROVIDE INFORMATION ON FILING A GRIEVANCE.
(B) (1) ON RECEIVING A GRIEVANCE, THE OFFICE SHALL:
(I) REVIEW THE GRIEVANCE;
(II) INVESTIGATE THE GRIEVANCE; AND
(III) MEDIATE A RESOLUTION BETWEEN THE CLIENT AND THE
PROVIDER.
(2) (I) EXCEPT AS PROVIDED IN SUBPARAGRAPH (II) OF THIS
PARAGRAPH, THE OFFICE MAY COORDINATE WITH THE DEPARTMENT OR THE U.S.
DEPARTMENT OF HOUSING AND URBAN DEVELOPMENT DURING AN
INVESTIGATION.
(II) THE OFFICE MAY NOT COORDINATE IN THE INVESTIGATION
OF A GRIEVANCE WITH ANY AGENCY THAT IS NAMED IN THE GRIEVANCE.

HOUSE BILL 1436
(3) IF THE GRIEVANCE IS NOT RESOLVED THROUGH MEDIATION, THE
OFFICE SHALL INFORM THE GRIEVANT OF ADDITIONAL RELEVANT LEGAL
SERVICES, INCLUDING THE SERVICES OF THE LEGAL AID BUREAUS.
(4) THE OFFICE SHALL ASSIST THE LEGAL AID BUREAUS AND OTHER
RELEVANT LEGAL SERVICE PROVIDERS IN ACCESSING RESOURCES, PROVIDING
GUIDANCE, AND OFFERING LEGAL OVERSIGHT FOR ANY CASES BROUGHT TO TRIAL
IN THE STATE AS THE RESULT OF A GRIEVANCE SUBMITTED UNDER THIS TITLE.
(C) (1) A PROVIDER SHALL:
(I) ATTACH A NOTICE OF THE OFFICE’S GRIEVANCE PROCESS
TO EACH LEASE AGREEMENT AND CLIENT PARTICIPATION AGREEMENT ON INITIAL
PROGRAM ENTRY; AND
(II) DISTRIBUTE A NOTICE OF THE OFFICE’S GRIEVANCE
PROCESS TO EXISTING CLIENTS ON AN ANNUAL BASIS.
(2) A NOTICE PROVIDED UNDER THIS SUBSECTION SHALL INCLUDE
THE OFFICE’S CONTACT INFORMATION, INCLUDING THE WEBSITE ADDRESS AND
HOTLINE NUMBER.
5.5–104.
(A) THE OFFICE MAY BRING AN ACTION FOR INJUNCTIVE RELIEF,
DAMAGES, OR OTHER RELIEF IF:
(1) A PROVIDER FAILS TO COOPERATE WITH AN INVESTIGATION OR
MEDIATION UNDER THIS TITLE; OR
(2) THE OFFICE IDENTIFIES A VIOLATION OF STATE OR FEDERAL
HOUSING LAW DURING THE COURSE OF AN INVESTIGATION UNDER THIS TITLE.
(B) IF A PROVIDER IS FOUND TO BE IN VIOLATION OF STATE OR FEDERAL
HOUSING LAW, AND THE VIOLATION HAS RESULTED IN HARM TO A CLIENT, THE
PROVIDER SHALL TAKE ALL NECESSARY MEASURES WITHIN THE PROVIDER’S
PURVIEW TO MAKE THE CLIENT WHOLE.
5.5–105.
(A) THE OFFICE MAY ADOPT REGULATIONS TO IMPLEMENT THIS TITLE.

HOUSE BILL 1436 5
(B) ON OR BEFORE JANUARY 1 EACH YEAR, THE OFFICE SHALL SUBMIT A
REPORT TO THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY, IN ACCORDANCE WITH § 2–1257 OF THE
STATE GOVERNMENT ARTICLE, ON THE NUMBER OF GRIEVANCES RECEIVED UNDER
THIS TITLE, THE REASON FOR EACH GRIEVANCE, AND THE OUTCOME OF EACH
GRIEVANCE DURING THE IMMEDIATELY PRECEDING FISCAL YEAR.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect July
1, 2026.